Hawaii statutes.
§200-43 Public auction. If the vessel
is not repossessed within twenty days after the mailing of the notice, the
vessel shall be disposed of by public auction, through oral tenders, or by
sealed bids, after public notice has been given at least once; provided that
the public auction shall not be held less than five days after the notice is
given. Where no bid is received, the vessel may be sold by negotiation,
disposed of as junk, or donated to any governmental agency. [L 1991, c 272, pt
of §2; am L 1998, c 2, §54]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next